Montana, session 2025, LC4340.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Statewide voter registration list coordinator -- duties. (1) There is a
statewide voter registration list coordinator who works for the legislative services division, provides regular
reports to the state administration and veterans' affairs interim committee and the legislative audit committee,
and works in collaboration with the office of the secretary of state. The coordinator must be responsible for the
accuracy, maintenance, and reconciliation of the statewide voter list and voter registrations.
(2) The coordinator shall work with county election administrators, the motor vehicle department of
the department of justice, the department of revenue, and any other state or federal agency as appropriate to
ensure that the statewide voter registration list is kept as accurate as possible.
(3) The coordinator shall respond to and resolve all concerns and complaints about the accuracy
of the list from citizens who have purchased access to the list pursuant to 13-2-222.
(4) The coordinator shall investigate all voter registration list discrepancies and report to the state
administration and veterans' affairs interim committee, the legislative audit committee, and the office of the
secretary of state regularly during the 2025-2026 interim.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Termination. [This act] terminates June 30, 2027.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****